apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="aber/is__vblex" c="p.51">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ias</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ìamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ìais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gei</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geis</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geit</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gemus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geis</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geint</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giais</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>rere</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reres</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reret</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reremus</l>   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rereis</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rerent</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>tu</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tos</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abèrrere">        <p><l>aber</l>      <r>abèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apàrrere">        <p><l>apar</l>      <r>apàrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cobèrrere">       <p><l>cober</l>     <r>cobèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cunfèrrere">      <p><l>cunfer</l>    <r>cunfèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fèrrere">         <p><l>fer</l>       <r>fèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscobèrrere">     <p><l>iscober</l>   <r>iscobèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mòrrere">         <p><l>mor</l>       <r>mòrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ofèrrere">        <p><l>ofer</l>      <r>ofèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prefèrrere">      <p><l>prefer</l>    <r>prefèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refèrrere">       <p><l>refer</l>     <r>refèrrere</r></p><par n="aber/is__vblex"/></e>
